District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.42

Legislative immunity.

For any speech or debate made in the course of their legislative duties, the members of the Council shall not be questioned in any other place.

History

June 8, 1976, D.C. Law 1-65, § 3, 22 DCR 7151

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-223.
1973 Ed., § 1-141b.